District of Columbia statutes.
23-523

Time of execution of search warrants.

(a)

A search warrant shall not be executed more than ten days after the date of issuance and shall be returned to the court after its execution or expiration in accordance with section 23-521(f)(6).

(b)

A search warrant may be executed on any day of the week and, in the absence of express authorization in the warrant pursuant to section 23-521(f)(5), shall be executed only during the hours of daylight. For the purposes of this subsection, the term “hours of daylight” means between 6:00 a.m. and 9:00 p.m.

History

June 3, 1997, D.C. Law 11-275, § 14(b), 44 DCR 1408
Dec. 10, 2009, D.C. Law 18-88, § 221, 56 DCR 7413

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 23-523.
1973 Ed., § 23-523.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 18-88, in subsec. (b), added the second sentence.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 221 of Omnibus Public Safety and Justice Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-181, August 6, 2009, 56 DCR 6903).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 221 of Omnibus Public Safety and Justice Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-227, October 21, 2009, 56 DCR 8668).